Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201612-512.01
Perpetual care
trust fund; trustees; duties.

Every cemetery association shall provide for and
select trustees, other than officers or members of the association, who shall
be selected, as provided for in section 12-512.03, to invest, safeguard, and
look after certain funds of the association, including the sums provided for
by section 12-512.02 and any other money acquired for the purposes of such
fund, in a perpetual care trust fund, the income therefrom to be used for
the perpetual care of the cemetery by the association.

Laws 1953, c. 20, § 1, p. 89;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 5.